Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1140.
do enact as follows:SB1140,11Section 1. 100.309 of the statutes is created to read:SB1140,2,32100.309 Algorithmic pricing of essential consumer goods. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:SB1140,2,64(a) “Algorithm” means a computational process or model that uses a set of 5rules to define a sequence of operation, including artificial intelligence systems, 6large-language model prediction systems, and machine learning systems.SB1140,2,77(b) “Consumer data” means any of the following:SB1140,2,1081. Data collected from a data broker, an online source, or directly from a 9consumer about a consumer’s behavior, characteristics, or other personal 10attributes.SB1140,2,13112. Surveillance data collected by means of sensors, cameras, or other devices 12or methods about a consumer’s behavior, characteristics, or other personal 13attributes.SB1140,2,1414(c) “Data broker” has the meaning given in s. 757.07 (1) (a).SB1140,3,41(d) “Essential consumer goods” means packaged foods products, personal care 2products, household paper products, household cleaning products, and other 3products regularly used by individuals within a household for their hygiene or 4personal maintenance. SB1140,3,65(e) “Food product” has the meaning given in s. 93.01 (6), but includes only 6products that are exempt from taxation under s. 77.54.SB1140,3,97(f) “Grocery retailer” means a retail seller of essential consumer goods in this 8state that generates more than 50 percent of its annual revenue from the sale of 9packaged food products.SB1140,3,1110(g) “Grocery store” means a retail store located in this state that is at least 1115,000 square feet in size and that is operated by a grocery retailer.SB1140,3,1212(h) “Personal information” has the meaning given in s. 134.98 (1) (b).SB1140,3,1313(i) “Personal care product” has the meaning given in s. 299.50 (1) (b).SB1140,3,1814(j) “Personalized algorithmic pricing” means pricing established by an 15algorithm that generates fluctuating prices for consumers based on real-time 16processing of consumer data. “Personalized algorithmic pricing” does not include 17price adjustments resulting from promotions, loyalty programs, or other temporary 18discounts broadly offered to attract or retain customers.SB1140,3,2419(2) Restrictions on pricing methods. (a) 1. Subject to subd. 2., a grocery 20retailer may not advertise, offer, or sell to a consumer any essential consumer good 21at a price that is established in whole or in part through the use of personalized 22algorithmic pricing unless the price is accompanied by the following disclosure in 23the same size, format, color, and field of vision as the price: “This price was set by 24an algorithm using personal data.”SB1140,4,412. A grocery retailer may not electronically display in a grocery store, within 2the same field of vision as an essential consumer good, a price for the essential 3consumer good that is established in whole or in part through the use of 4personalized algorithmic pricing.SB1140,4,85(b) A grocery retailer may not engage in personalized algorithmic pricing that 6results in any essential consumer good being advertised, offered, or sold to a 7consumer at a price that can vary based in whole or in part on the consumer’s sex, 8race, color, creed, disability, sexual orientation, national origin, or ancestry.SB1140,4,119(c) A grocery retailer may not purchase or otherwise acquire from a data 10broker personal information about a consumer for purposes related to the pricing of 11any essential consumer good advertised, offered, or sold to the consumer.SB1140,4,1412(3) Enforcement; penalty; private cause of action. (a) 1. Except as 13provided in subd. 2., any person who violates this section may be required to forfeit 14not more than $1,000 for each violation.SB1140,4,16152. Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be required to forfeit 16not less than $1,000 nor more than $2,000 for each violation.SB1140,4,1817(b) 1. The department or the department of justice may investigate violations 18of this section.SB1140,5,3192. If the department or the department of justice has reason to believe that a 20person is in possession, custody, or control of any information or documentary 21material relevant to the enforcement of this section, it may require the person to 22submit a statement or report, under oath or otherwise, as to the facts and 23circumstances concerning any activity in the course of trade or commerce; examine 24the person under oath with respect to any activity in the course of trade or 1commerce; and execute in writing and cause to be served upon the person a civil 2investigative demand requiring the person to produce any relevant documentary 3material for inspection and copying.SB1140,5,843. The department and the department of justice may subpoena persons and 5require the production of books and other documents, administer oaths, and 6conduct hearings to aid in any investigation under this paragraph. The department 7of justice may request the department to aid in the investigation of alleged 8violations of this section.SB1140,5,1394. If a person fails to file any statement or report, or fails to comply with any 10civil investigative demand, or fails to obey any subpoena issued by the department 11or department of justice under this paragraph, the person may be coerced as 12provided in s. 885.12, except that no person is required to furnish any testimony or 13evidence under this paragraph that might tend to incriminate the person.SB1140,5,1714(c) The department or the department of justice, or any district attorney after 15consulting with the department, may bring an action in a court of competent 16jurisdiction on behalf of the state for a violation of this section and, upon prevailing, 17is entitled to any of the following forms of relief:SB1140,5,21181. A temporary or permanent injunction. The court may, upon entry of final 19judgment, award restitution when appropriate to any person suffering loss because 20of a violation of this section if proof of the loss is submitted to the satisfaction of the 21court.SB1140,5,22222. Imposition of a penalty under par. (a).SB1140,6,323(d) In addition to any other remedies, any person aggrieved by a violation of 24this section may bring a civil action for damages. If the person prevails, the court 1shall also award the person all costs of the action, including reasonable attorney 2fees notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1). In such an action, the court may also award any 3equitable relief that the court determines is appropriate.SB1140,6,54(4) Rule making. The department may promulgate rules to administer and 5enforce this section. SB1140,26Section 2. Effective date.SB1140,6,87(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 8publication.SB1140,6,99